Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-356
Hearings.

Hearings shall be held in open court upon the oral testimony of witnesses or upon the depositions of such witnesses taken as in other actions. The court may in its discretion close the hearing and may restrict the availability of the evidence or bill of exceptions.

Laws 1972, LB 820, § 10.

Notice and hearing required to modify custody of child except where court retained custody in original order. Brandl v. Brandl, 197 Neb. 778, 251 N.W.2d 155 (1977).

This section does not prohibit a trial court from allowing one of the parties, who is imprisoned and not permitted to personally attend, to appear by telephone during a final hearing held in open court upon the oral testimony of witnesses. Conn v. Conn, 13 Neb. App. 472, 695 N.W.2d 674 (2005).

In matters pertaining to dissolution, such as custody, hearings shall be held in open court upon the oral testimony of witnesses or upon the depositions of such witnesses taken as in other actions. Where a modification of custody is concerned, a judicial determination of the best interests of the children must be based on evidence preserved in the record. Burns v. Burns, 2 Neb. App. 795, 514 N.W.2d 848 (1994).